Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 56. Alaska Housing Finance Corporation.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to the merger of the Alaska State Housing Authority into the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, see § 141, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For legislative findings and purpose in connection with the enactment of ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, see §§ 1 and 2, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary provision providing for loan forbearance by the state, including a loan for a single family residential mortgage or public housing assistance by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, in case of financial hardship during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared March 11, 2020, see § 23, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For a temporary provision relating to financial assistance to address and prevent homelessness caused by the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency, see § 30, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska housing finance corporation, see 15 AAC 150.

For AHFC general programs, see 15 AAC 151.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation cannot constitutionally cease making funds available to mortgage companies that are not headquartered in the state.
December 26, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.